Arkansas, session 2025, HB1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 19 — Arkansas Medical Audit Bill of Rights Act

23-99-1901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Medical Audit Bill of Rights Act".

23-99-1902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Audit" means an investigation or review of a claim
submitted by a healthcare provider if the investigation or review:
(A) Is conducted by an auditor; and
(B) Involves records, documents, or information other than
*ANS186*
03-18-2025 10:47:52 ANS186

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/18/25 HB1314
the filed claim;
(2) "Auditor" means:
(A) An insurance company;
(B) A third-party payor; or
(C) An entity that represents a responsible party,
including a company or group that administers claims services;
(3)(A) "Clerical or recordkeeping error" means a mistake in the
filed claim regarding a required document or record.
(B) "Clerical or recordkeeping error" includes without
limitation:
(i) A typographical error;
(ii) A scrivener's error; or
(iii) A computer error; and
(4)(A) "Healthcare provider" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
healthcare services.
(B) "Healthcare provider" does not include a pharmacy that
is subject to § 17-92-1201.

23-99-1903. Arkansas Medical Audit Bill of Rights.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, when an audit is conducted by an
auditor, the audit shall be conducted according to the following bill of
rights:
(1) An auditor conducting the initial audit shall give the
healthcare provider notice of the audit at least one (1) week before
conducting the initial audit for each audit cycle;
(2) An audit that involves the application of clinical or
professional judgment shall be conducted by or in consultation with a
healthcare provider of the same specialty as the healthcare provider being
audited;
(3)(A) A clerical or recordkeeping error shall not:
(i) Constitute fraud; or
(ii) Be subject to criminal penalties without proof
of intent to commit fraud.
(B) A claim arising under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section may be subject to recoupment;
03-18-2025 10:47:52 ANS186

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/18/25 HB1314
(4)(A) A finding of an overpayment or underpayment of a filed
claim may be a projection based on the number of patients served by the
healthcare provider having a similar diagnosis.
(B) Recoupment of claims under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of
this section shall be based on the actual overpayment unless the projection
for overpayment or underpayment is part of a settlement by the healthcare
provider;
(5)(A) When an audit is for a specifically identified problem
that has been disclosed to the healthcare provider, the audit shall be
limited to a claim that is identified by a claim number.
(B) For an audit other than that described in subdivision
(b)(5)(A) of this section, the audit shall be limited to the greater of:
(i) Fifty (50) claims; or
(ii) Twenty-five one-hundredths of one percent
(0.25%) of the number of claims billed by the healthcare provider to the
auditor in the previous calendar year.
(C) If an audit reveals the necessity for a review of
additional claims, the audit shall be conducted by one (1) of the following
methods at the discretion of the healthcare provider:
(i) On-site;
(ii) Electronically; or
(iii) By the same method as the initial audit.
(D) Except for an audit initiated under subdivision
(b)(5)(A) of this section, an auditor shall not initiate an audit of a
healthcare provider more than two (2) times in a calendar year;
(6) A recoupment shall not be based on:
(A) Documentation requirements in addition to the
requirements for creating or maintaining documentation prescribed by state
law or rule or federal law or regulation; or
(B) A requirement that a healthcare provider perform
professional duties prescribed by state law or rule or federal law or
regulation;
(7)(A) Recoupment shall only occur following the correction of a claim and
shall be limited to amounts paid in excess of amounts payable under the
corrected claim.
(B) An auditor may recoup the entire overpaid claim if
03-18-2025 10:47:52 ANS186

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/18/25 HB1314
payment is issued for the corrected claim on the same date.
(C) Following a notice of overpayment, a healthcare
provider shall have at least sixty (60) days to file a corrected claim;
(8) Approval of a healthcare service, healthcare provider, or
patient eligibility upon adjudication of a claim shall not be reversed unless
the healthcare provider obtained the adjudication by fraud or
misrepresentation of claim elements;
(9) Each healthcare provider shall be audited under the same
standards and parameters as other similarly situated healthcare providers
audited by the auditor;
(10) A healthcare provider shall be allowed at least sixty (60)
days following receipt of the preliminary audit report in which to produce
documentation to address any discrepancy found during the audit;
(11) The period covered by an audit shall not exceed twenty-four
(24) months from the date the claim was submitted to or adjudicated by an
auditor;
(12)(A) The preliminary audit report under subdivision (a)(10)
of this section shall be delivered to a healthcare provider within one
hundred twenty (120) days after the conclusion of the audit.
(B) A final audit report shall be delivered to the
healthcare provider within six (6) months after receipt of the preliminary
audit report or receipt of the final appeal as provided for in this
subsection, whichever is later; and
(13) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the
auditor conducting the audit shall not use the accounting practice of
extrapolation in calculating recoupments or penalties for audits.
(b) A recoupment of any disputed funds shall only occur after final
internal disposition of the audit, including the appeals process as described
in subsection (c) of this section.
(c)(1) An auditor that conducts an audit shall:
(A) Establish an appeals process under which a healthcare
provider may appeal an unfavorable preliminary audit report to the auditor;
and
(B) Provide a copy of the final audit report to the health
benefit plan sponsor after the completion of any review process.
(2) If following the appeal under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this
03-18-2025 10:47:52 ANS186

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/18/25 HB1314
section the auditor finds that an unfavorable audit report or any portion of
the unfavorable audit report is unsubstantiated, the auditor shall dismiss
the audit report or the unsubstantiated portion of the audit report without
any further proceedings.
(d) The total amount of any recoupment on an audit shall be refunded
to the party responsible for payment of the claim.
(e) This section does not apply to:
(1) Any audit on behalf of the Arkansas Medicaid Program
conducted by the Department of Human Services or its designee; or
(2) Any audit, review, or investigation that involves alleged
fraud, willful misrepresentation, or abuse, including without limitation:
(A) Fraud involving the Arkansas Medicaid Program as described
in § 5-55-111;
(B) Abuse as defined in § 20-77-1702;
(C) Fraud as defined in § 20-77-1702; or
(D) Insurance fraud.
(f) The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to implement,
administer, and enforce this subchapter.

/s/L. Johnson
















03-18-2025 10:47:52 ANS186